Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-602
Public policy.

Underground storage of natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas or both is found and declared to be in the public interest if it promotes the conservation of natural gas and permits the accumulation of natural gas reserves or liquefied petroleum gas reserves or both in an underground reservoir in order to make natural gas more readily available to the domestic, commercial, and industrial consumers of this state.

Laws 1953, c. 191, § 2, p. 614;

Laws 1963, c. 325, § 2, p. 985.